Utah statutes.
77-30-8.   Execution of warrant of arrest.
Such warrant shall authorize the peace officer or other person to whom
directed to arrest the accused at any time and any place where he may be found
within the state and to command the aid of all peace officers or other persons
in the execution of the warrant, and to deliver the accused, subject to the
provisions of this act to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state.
